District of Columbia statutes.
Omitted

4-101

Board of Charities, Board of Children’s Guardians, and National Training School for Girls abolished.

Omitted.

Grants to states for aid to families with children and for child-welfare services, Social Security Act, see 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.
This section is referenced in § 4-220.01.
The provisions of former § 4-101 have been omitted as obsolete, the Boards referred to herein having been abolished. The former Board of Charities, Board of Children’s Guardians, and the Board of Trustees of the National Training School for Girls were abolished upon the appointment and organization of the Board of Public Welfare pursuant to the Act of March 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 208, ch. 58, § 1. The Board of Public Welfare was subsequently abolished. See notes to § 4-102.